Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-11,155
Student achievement coordinator; appointment; qualifications; duties.

The Commissioner of Education shall appoint a student achievement coordinator, subject to confirmation by a majority vote of the members of the State Board of Education. The coordinator shall have a background and training in addressing the unique educational needs of low-achieving students, including students in poverty, limited English proficient students, and highly mobile students.

The coordinator shall evaluate and coordinate existing resources for effective programs to increase achievement for such students across the state.

The coordinator or other department staff designated by the Commissioner of Education shall also consult with learning communities, educational service units, and school districts on the development, implementation, and evaluation of community achievement plans. In addition, the coordinator or other department staff designated by the commissioner shall conduct an initial review of submitted community achievement plans and return the plans with any suggestions or comments prior to the final submission of the plan for approval by the State Board of Education.

Laws 2014, LB967, § 21;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 57;

Laws 2018, LB1081, § 16.